Arkansas, session 2025, SB328.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-27-601(1), concerning the definition of
"child" as it applies to computer crimes against minors, is amended to read
as follows:
(1) “Child” means any person under seventeen (17) eighteen (18)
years of age;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 5-27-602(c), concerning an affirmative
defense to prosecution for distributing, possessing, or viewing of matter
depicting sexually explicit conduct involving a child, is amended to read as
follows:
(c) It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution under this section
that the defendant in good faith reasonably believed that the person depicted
in the matter was seventeen (17) eighteen (18) years of age or older.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 5-27-607 is amended to read as follows:
5-27-607. Determination of age of person.
(a) For purposes of this subchapter, the state must prove beyond a
reasonable doubt that a person who is depicted as or presents the appearance
*LJH162*
02/26/2025 4:19:49 PM LJH162

SB328
of being under seventeen (17) eighteen (18) years of age in any photograph,
film, videotape, computer program or file, video game, or any other
reproduction or reconstruction picture or image is under seventeen (17)
eighteen (18) years of age.
(b) If it becomes necessary for a purpose of this subchapter to
determine whether a person depicted engaging in sexually explicit conduct was
under seventeen (17) eighteen (18) years of age, the court or jury trier of
fact may shall make this determination by any of the following methods:
(1) Personal inspection of the person;
(2) Inspection of the photograph, film, videotape, computer
program or file, video game, or any other reproduction or reconstruction
picture or image that depicts the person engaging in the sexually explicit
conduct;
(3) Expert medical testimony Testimony based on the appearance
of the person engaged in the sexually explicit conduct; or
(4) Any other method authorized by law.




















02/26/2025 4:19:49 PM LJH162